Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1399.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 73 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER B.1EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS REQUIREMENTSFOR COVERED FACILITIESSec.7329.1. Definitions.7329.2. Emergency preparedness plan.7329.3. Coordination and distribution.7329.4. Review and update of plan.7329.5. Enforcement.12345678910111213141516171819 7329.6. Confidentiality.7329.7. Regulations.§ 7329.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Covered facility." A facility licensed or regulated by the Commonwealth that is any of the following:(1) A health care facility licensed by the Department of Health under the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, including a long-term care nursing facility.(2) A personal care home or assisted living residence licensed by the Department of Human Services.(3) A child day-care center, group child-care home or family child-care home regulated by the Department of Human Services.(4) A drug and alcohol treatment facility or recovery house licensed, certified or regulated by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.(5) Another residential or day-use facility that serves a vulnerable population and that is licensed or regulated by the Department of Health or the Department of Human Services, as determined by the Department of Health or the Department of Human Services."Emergency preparedness plan." A written plan developed, maintained and implemented by a covered facility under section 7329.2(a) (relating to emergency preparedness plan)."Local emergency responder." Any of the following that provides or may provide emergency response services to a covered 20260SB1399PN1855 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility:(1) A law enforcement agency.(2) A fire department or fire company.(3) An emergency medical services agency.(4) A rescue squad.(5) A county emergency management agency."Material revision." A revision to an emergency preparedness plan that revises the information required under section 7329.2(b) or otherwise revises the information provided under section 7329.3 (relating to coordination and distribution).§ 7329.2. Emergency preparedness plan.(a) Plan required.--A covered facility shall develop, maintain and implement a written emergency preparedness plan to address fire, explosion, evacuation, shelter-in-place and other hazards that may threaten the health or safety of a resident, staff member or visitor.(b) Minimum requirements.--An emergency preparedness plan shall include all of the following:(1) Procedures to account for each resident, staff member and visitor during an emergency, including methods to track the status of and communicate information about an individual to a local emergency responder.(2) Identification of a designated on-site emergency coordinator who has authority during an emergency and is responsible for communication and coordination with a local emergency responder.(3) Essential preincident information necessary to support an emergency response, including information relating to facility layout, building systems, access points, utility shutoffs and evacuation procedures.20260SB1399PN1855 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 7329.3. Coordination and distribution.(a) Distribution requirement.--A covered facility shall provide to each local emergency responder a current copy of the facility's emergency preparedness plan or a standardized summary of the plan in the form required by the Department of Health , the Department of Human Services and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs for covered facilities under their respective jurisdictions.(b) Timing.--A covered facility shall provide the emergency preparedness plan or summary required under subsection (a):(1) upon initial development of the plan;(2) after each annual review required under section 7329.4 (relating to review and update of plan); and(3) within 30 days after a material revision to the plan.§ 7329.4. Review and update of plan.A covered facility shall review the facility's emergency preparedness plan at least annually and shall update the plan as necessary to reflect changes in facility operation, staffing, resident or client needs, building systems or local emergency response capabilities.§ 7329.5. Enforcement.(a) Department responsibility.--The Department of Health , the Department of Human Services and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall enforce compliance with this subchapter for covered facilities under their respective jurisdictions.(b) Licensure.--Compliance with this subchapter shall be a condition of licensure, certification or continued operation of a covered facility.(c) Inspection.--During an inspection, survey or other 20260SB1399PN1855 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensure activity, the Department of Health , the Department of Human Services and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs may require covered facilities under their respective jurisdictions to produce emergency preparedness plans for review.§ 7329.6. Confidentiality.An emergency preparedness plan or a portion of an emergency preparedness plan, that identifies security-sensitive information, vulnerabilities, access controls or response procedures shall not be subject to public disclosure under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.§ 7329.7. Regulations.The Department of Health , the Department of Human Services and the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this subchapter for covered facilities under their respective jurisdictions, including regulations providing for a standardized format or summary for distribution under section 7329.3 (relating to coordination and distribution).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1399PN1855 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021